Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.030

Application for certificate of competency—Medical gas piping installer endorsement—Evidence required.

(1) Any person desiring to be issued a certificate of competency as provided in this chapter shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that said person has had sufficient experience in as well as demonstrated general competency in the trade of plumbing or specialty plumbing so as to qualify him or her to make an application for a certificate of competency as a journey level plumber, specialty plumber, or residential service plumber. Completion of a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school accredited by the workforce training and education coordinating board shall constitute sufficient evidence of experience and competency to enable such person to make application for a certificate of competency for a journey level plumber, specialty plumber, or residential service plumber.

(2) Any person desiring to be issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that the person has met the requirements established by the department for a medical gas piping installer endorsement.

(3) In addition to supplying the evidence as prescribed in this section, each applicant for a certificate of competency shall submit an application for such certificate on such form and in such manner as shall be prescribed by the director of the department.

[ 2020 c 153 s 7; 2013 c 23 s 16; 2011 c 336 s 504; 1997 c 326 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 149 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 175 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 326: See note following RCW 18.106.010.